Washington statutes.
RCW 19.138.1701

Reimbursement of appropriated funds—Fees.

Any state funds appropriated to the department of licensing for implementation of chapter 237, Laws of 1994 for the biennium ending June 30, 1995, shall be reimbursed by June 30, 1997, by an assessment of fees sufficient to cover all costs of implementing chapter 237, Laws of 1994.

[ 1994 c 237 s 30.]